Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.598 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in[For purposes of] this section, "bona fide promotion or career advancement":
(a) Means:
1. A professional advancement in substantially the same line of work held by the employee in the
four (4) years immediately prior to the final five (5) fiscal years preceding retirement or a change
in employment position based on the training, skills, education, or expertise of the employee that
imposes a significant change in job duties and responsibilities to clearly justify the increased
compensation to the member; or
2. a. An increase in creditable compensation for all employees in a specified class due to an
increase in rate of pay authorized or funded by the legislative or administrative body of
the employer or due to an increase in rate of pay mandated in a collective bargaining
agreement approved by the legislative body of the employer.
b. Subdivision a. of this subparagraph shall be retroactive to apply to any member whose
effective retirement date occurred on or after July 1, 2021; and
(b) Does not include any circumstance where an elected official participating in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System or the County Employees Retirement System takes a position of employment with a
different employer participating in any of the state-administered retirement systems.
(2) (a) For employees retiring from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, the County Employees
Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System on or after January 1, 2018, the systems
shall, for each of the retiring employee's last five (5) fiscal years of employment, identify any fiscal year
in which the creditable compensation increased at a rate of ten percent (10%) or more annually over the
immediately preceding fiscal year's creditable compensation. The employee's creditable compensation
in the fiscal year immediately prior to the employee's last five (5) fiscal years of employment shall be
utilized to compare the initial fiscal year in the five (5) fiscal year period.
(b) Except as limited or excluded by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any amount of increase in
creditable compensation for a fiscal year identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection that exceeds
ten percent (10%) more than the employee's creditable compensation from the immediately preceding
fiscal year shall not be included in the creditable compensation used to calculate the retiring employee's
monthly retirement allowance. If the creditable compensation for a specific fiscal year identified under
paragraph (a) of this subsection as exceeding the ten percent (10%) increase limitation is not used to
calculate the retiring employee's monthly retirement allowance, then no reduction in creditable
compensation shall occur for that fiscal year.
(c) If the creditable compensation of the retiring employee is reduced as provided by paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the retirement systems:
1. Shall refund the employee contributions and interest attributable to the reduction in creditable
compensation; and
2. Shall not refund the employer contributions paid but shall utilize those funds to pay down the
unfunded liability of the pension fund in which the retiring employee participated.
(3) (a) In order to ensure the prospective application of the limitations on increases in creditable compensation
contained in subsection (2) of this section, only the creditable compensation earned by the retiring
employee on or after July 1, 2017, shall be subject to reduction under subsection (2) of this section.
Creditable compensation earned by the retiring employee prior to July 1, 2017, shall not be subject to
reduction under subsection (2) of this section.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) If the reductions in creditable compensation during a retiring member's entire last five (5) years of
employment results in a reduction in his or her monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-five
dollars ($25) per month or an actuarially equivalent value under the various payment options, then no
reduction in creditable compensation or retirement allowances shall occur under subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) A bona fide promotion or career advancement as defined by subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A lump-sum payment for compensatory time paid to an employee upon termination of employment;
(c) A lump-sum payment made pursuant to an alternate sick leave program under KRS 78.616(5) that is
paid to an employee upon termination of employment;
(d) Increases in creditable compensation in a fiscal year over the immediately preceding fiscal year, where
in the immediately preceding fiscal year the employer reported the employee as being on leave without
pay for any reason, including but not limited to sick leave without pay, maternity leave, leave
authorized under the Family Medical Leave Act, and any period of time where the employee received
workers' compensation benefit payments that were not reported to the plan as creditable compensation;
(e) Increases in creditable compensation directly attributable to an employee's receipt of compensation for:
1. Overtime hours worked while serving as a participating employee under any state or federal
grant, grant pass-through, or similar program that requires overtime as a condition or necessity of
the employer's receipt of the grant; or
2. The first one hundred (100) hours of mandatory overtime hours that the employee is individually
required to work by the employer during a fiscal year. This subparagraph shall not be construed
to apply to overtime hours voluntarily worked by the employee or in situations in which the
employee has the option to elect out of participation in overtime hours. Any mandatory overtime
hours exempt under this subparagraph shall be in addition to any overtime hours otherwise
exempt under the provisions of this subsection; and
(f) Increases in creditable compensation directly attributable to an employee's receipt of compensation for
overtime performed during and as a result of a state of emergency declared by:
1. The President of the United States or the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; or
2. A local government in which the Governor authorizes mobilization of the Kentucky National
Guard pursuant to KRS 38.030 and 39A.950 during such time as the National Guard is
mobilized.
(5) (a) For employees retiring on or after January 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2017, the last participating
employer shall be required to pay for any additional actuarial costs resulting from annual increases in an
employee's creditable compensation greater than ten percent (10%) over the employee's last five (5)
fiscal years of employment that are not the direct result of a bona fide promotion or career
advancement. The cost shall be determined by the retirement systems.
(b) Lump-sum payments for compensatory time paid to an employee upon termination of employment shall
be exempt from this subsection.
(c) The Authority shall be required to answer inquiries from participating employers regarding this
subsection. Upon request of the employer prior to the employee's change of position or hiring, the
systems shall make a determination that is binding to the systems as to whether or not a change of
position or hiring constitutes a bona fide promotion or career advancement.
(d) For any additional actuarial costs charged to the employer under this subsection, the systems shall allow
the employer to pay the costs without interest over a period of one (1) year from the date of receipt of
the employer's final invoice.
(6) The Authority shall determine whether increases in creditable compensation during the last five (5) fiscal years
of employment prior to retirement constitute a bona fide promotion or career advancement and may
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section. All
state-administered retirement systems shall cooperate to implement this section.

CHAPTER 189 3
(7) Any employer who disagrees with a determination made by the system in accordance with this section
regarding whether an increase in compensation constitutes a bona fide promotion or career advancement for
purposes of subsection (5) of this section may request a hearing and appeal the decision in accordance with
KRS 61.645(16) or 78.782(16).
(8) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, and subsequent years, the Kentucky Retirement Systems and the
County Employees Retirement System shall provide a means for employers to separately report the specific
exceptions provided in subsection (4) of this section within the reporting system utilized by the employers for
making employer reports under KRS 16.645, 61.675, and 78.545. The Kentucky Retirement Systems and the
County Employees Retirement System shall continually provide communication, instructions, training, and
educational opportunities for employers regarding how to appropriately report exemptions established by
subsection (4) of this section.
(9) This section shall not apply to employees participating in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS
16.583, 61.597, 78.5512, and 78.5516.
Section 2. The Kentucky Public Pensions Authority shall review the accounts of members who had an
effective retirement date that occurred on or after July 1, 2021, and shall retroactively adjust recipient benefits
accordingly to reflect the amendments to subsection (1)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act, including any benefits the
recipient would have received had the amendments to subsection (1)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act been in effect
immediately prior to the member's effective retirement date.
Signed by Governor April 17, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version